Illinois, session 104th, SB3024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 370c as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370c)  (from Ch. 73, par. 982c)7    Sec. 370c. Mental and emotional disorders. 8    (a)(1) On and after January 1, 2022 (the effective date of 9Public Act 102-579), every insurer that amends, delivers, 10issues, or renews group accident and health policies providing 11coverage for hospital or medical treatment or services for 12illness shall provide coverage for the medically necessary 13treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions consistent with the parity 15requirements of Section 370c.1 of this Code.16    (2) Each insured that is covered for mental, emotional, 17nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions shall be 18free to select the physician licensed to practice medicine in 19all its branches, licensed clinical psychologist, licensed 20clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional 21counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed 22speech-language pathologist, or other licensed or certified 23professional at a program licensed pursuant to the Substance   SB3024- 2 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1Use Disorder Act of his or her choice to treat such disorders, 2and the insurer shall pay the covered charges of such 3physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 4licensed clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social 5worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 6marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 7pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 8program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act up 9to the limits of coverage, provided (i) the disorder or 10condition treated is covered by the policy, and (ii) the 11physician, licensed psychologist, licensed clinical social 12worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 13marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 14pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 15program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act is 16authorized to provide said services under the statutes of this 17State and in accordance with accepted principles of his or her 18profession.19    (3) Insofar as this Section applies solely to licensed 20clinical social workers, licensed clinical professional 21counselors, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed 22speech-language pathologists, and other licensed or certified 23professionals at programs licensed pursuant to the Substance 24Use Disorder Act, those persons who may provide services to 25individuals shall do so after the licensed clinical social 26worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed   SB3024- 3 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 2pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 3program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act 4has informed the patient of the desirability of the patient 5conferring with the patient's primary care physician.6    (4) "Mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder 7or condition" means a condition or disorder that involves a 8mental health condition or substance use disorder that falls 9under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the mental 10and behavioral disorders chapter of the current edition of the 11World Health Organization's International Classification of 12Disease or that is listed in the most recent version of the 13American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical 14Manual of Mental Disorders. "Mental, emotional, nervous, or 15substance use disorder or condition" includes any mental 16health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the 17postpartum period and includes, but is not limited to, 18postpartum depression.19    (5) Medically necessary treatment and medical necessity 20determinations shall be interpreted and made in a manner that 21is consistent with and pursuant to subsections (h) through 22(y). 23    (b)(1) (Blank).24    (2) (Blank).25    (2.5) (Blank). 26    (3) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law and   SB3024- 4 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1consistent with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of 2this Code, the insurer that amends, delivers, issues, or 3renews a group or individual policy of accident and health 4insurance, a qualified health plan offered through the health 5insurance marketplace, or a provider of treatment of mental, 6emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 7shall furnish medical records or other necessary data that 8substantiate that initial or continued treatment is at all 9times medically necessary. Nothing in this paragraph (3) 10supersedes the prohibition on prior authorization requirements 11to the extent provided under subsections (g) and (w) and 12subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6.5) of this subsection. 13Nothing prevents the insured from agreeing in writing to 14continue treatment at his or her expense. When making a 15determination of the medical necessity for a treatment 16modality for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 17disorders or conditions, an insurer must make the 18determination in a manner that is consistent with the manner 19used to make that determination with respect to other diseases 20or illnesses covered under the policy, including an appeals 21process. Medical necessity determinations for substance use 22disorders shall be made in accordance with appropriate patient 23placement criteria established by the American Society of 24Addiction Medicine. No additional criteria may be used to make 25medical necessity determinations for substance use disorders. 26    (4) A group health benefit plan amended, delivered,   SB3024- 5 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the effective 2date of Public Act 100-1024) or an individual policy of 3accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 4offered through the health insurance marketplace amended, 5delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the 6effective date of Public Act 100-1024):7        (A) shall provide coverage based upon medical 8    necessity for the treatment of a mental, emotional, 9    nervous, or substance use disorder or condition consistent 10    with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of this 11    Code; provided, however, that in each calendar year 12    coverage shall not be less than the following:13            (i) 45 days of inpatient treatment; and14            (ii) beginning on June 26, 2006 (the effective 15        date of Public Act 94-921), 60 visits for outpatient 16        treatment including group and individual outpatient 17        treatment; and18            (iii) for plans or policies delivered, issued for 19        delivery, renewed, or modified after January 1, 2007 20        (the effective date of Public Act 94-906), 20 21        additional outpatient visits for speech therapy for 22        treatment of pervasive developmental disorders that 23        will be in addition to speech therapy provided 24        pursuant to item (ii) of this subparagraph (A); and25        (B) may not include a lifetime limit on the number of 26    days of inpatient treatment or the number of outpatient   SB3024- 6 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    visits covered under the plan.2        (C) (Blank).3    (5) An issuer of a group health benefit plan or an 4individual policy of accident and health insurance or a 5qualified health plan offered through the health insurance 6marketplace may not count toward the number of outpatient 7visits required to be covered under this Section an outpatient 8visit for the purpose of medication management and shall cover 9the outpatient visits under the same terms and conditions as 10it covers outpatient visits for the treatment of physical 11illness.12    (5.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 13delivered, issued, or renewed on or after September 9, 2015 14(the effective date of Public Act 99-480) shall offer coverage 15for medically necessary acute treatment services and medically 16necessary clinical stabilization services. The treating 17provider shall base all treatment recommendations and the 18health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 19determinations for substance use disorders in accordance with 20the most current edition of the Treatment Criteria for 21Addictive, Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 22established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine. The 23treating provider shall base all treatment recommendations and 24the health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 25determinations for medication-assisted treatment in accordance 26with the most current Treatment Criteria for Addictive,   SB3024- 7 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions established by 2the American Society of Addiction Medicine.3    As used in this subsection:4    "Acute treatment services" means 24-hour medically 5supervised addiction treatment that provides evaluation and 6withdrawal management and may include biopsychosocial 7assessment, individual and group counseling, psychoeducational 8groups, and discharge planning.9    "Clinical stabilization services" means 24-hour treatment, 10usually following acute treatment services for substance 11abuse, which may include intensive education and counseling 12regarding the nature of addiction and its consequences, 13relapse prevention, outreach to families and significant 14others, and aftercare planning for individuals beginning to 15engage in recovery from addiction. 16    "Prior authorization" has the meaning given to that term 17in Section 15 of the Prior Authorization Reform Act. 18    (6) An issuer of a group health benefit plan may provide or 19offer coverage required under this Section through a managed 20care plan.21    (6.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 22delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the 23effective date of Public Act 100-1024):24        (A) shall not impose prior authorization requirements, 25    including limitations on dosage, other than those 26    established under the Treatment Criteria for Addictive,   SB3024- 8 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 2    established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine, 3    on a prescription medication approved by the United States 4    Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed or 5    administered for the treatment of substance use disorders;6        (B) shall not impose any step therapy requirements;7        (C) shall place all prescription medications approved 8    by the United States Food and Drug Administration 9    prescribed or administered for the treatment of substance 10    use disorders on, for brand medications, the lowest tier 11    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 12    individual or group health benefit plan that covers brand 13    medications and, for generic medications, the lowest tier 14    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 15    individual or group health benefit plan that covers 16    generic medications; and17        (D) shall not exclude coverage for a prescription 18    medication approved by the United States Food and Drug 19    Administration for the treatment of substance use 20    disorders and any associated counseling or wraparound 21    services on the grounds that such medications and services 22    were court ordered.23    (7) (Blank).24    (8) (Blank).25    (9) With respect to all mental, emotional, nervous, or 26substance use disorders or conditions, coverage for inpatient   SB3024- 9 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1treatment shall include coverage for treatment in a 2residential treatment center certified or licensed by the 3Department of Public Health or the Department of Human 4Services. 5    (10) A group or individual policy of accident and health 6insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 7issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall cover up 8to 12 mental health provider visits per plan year, with no 9visitation restrictions, if a local or State emergency is 10declared due to immigration enforcement activity and the 11insured has experienced loss, trauma, or displacement due to 12such activity. The coverage shall not be subject to 13deductibles, copayments, or other forms of cost sharing. 14    (c) This Section shall not be interpreted to require 15coverage for speech therapy or other habilitative services for 16those individuals covered under Section 356z.15 of this Code. 17    (d) With respect to a group or individual policy of 18accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 19offered through the health insurance marketplace, the 20Department and, with respect to medical assistance, the 21Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall each 22enforce the requirements of this Section and Sections 356z.23 23and 370c.1 of this Code, the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici 24Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, 42 25U.S.C. 18031(j), and any amendments to, and federal guidance 26or regulations issued under, those Acts, including, but not   SB3024- 10 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1limited to, final regulations issued under the Paul Wellstone 2and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 3Act of 2008 and final regulations applying the Paul Wellstone 4and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 5Act of 2008 to Medicaid managed care organizations, the 6Children's Health Insurance Program, and alternative benefit 7plans. Specifically, the Department and the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services shall take action:9        (1) proactively ensuring compliance by individual and 10    group policies, including by requiring that insurers 11    submit comparative analyses, as set forth in paragraph (6) 12    of subsection (k) of Section 370c.1, demonstrating how 13    they design and apply nonquantitative treatment 14    limitations, both as written and in operation, for mental, 15    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder or condition 16    benefits as compared to how they design and apply 17    nonquantitative treatment limitations, as written and in 18    operation, for medical and surgical benefits;19        (2) evaluating all consumer or provider complaints 20    regarding mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 21    disorder or condition coverage for possible parity 22    violations;23        (3) performing parity compliance market conduct 24    examinations or, in the case of the Department of 25    Healthcare and Family Services, parity compliance audits 26    of individual and group plans and policies, including, but   SB3024- 11 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    not limited to, reviews of:2            (A) nonquantitative treatment limitations, 3        including, but not limited to, prior authorization 4        requirements, concurrent review, retrospective review, 5        step therapy, network admission standards, 6        reimbursement rates, and geographic restrictions;7            (B) denials of authorization, payment, and 8        coverage; and9            (C) other specific criteria as may be determined 10        by the Department.11    The findings and the conclusions of the parity compliance 12market conduct examinations and audits shall be made public.13    The Director may adopt rules to effectuate any provisions 14of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity 15and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 that relate to the business of 16insurance.17    (e) Availability of plan information. 18        (1) The criteria for medical necessity determinations 19    made under a group health plan, an individual policy of 20    accident and health insurance, or a qualified health plan 21    offered through the health insurance marketplace with 22    respect to mental health or substance use disorder 23    benefits (or health insurance coverage offered in 24    connection with the plan with respect to such benefits) 25    must be made available by the plan administrator (or the 26    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to any   SB3024- 12 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    current or potential participant, beneficiary, or 2    contracting provider upon request. 3        (2) The reason for any denial under a group health 4    benefit plan, an individual policy of accident and health 5    insurance, or a qualified health plan offered through the 6    health insurance marketplace (or health insurance coverage 7    offered in connection with such plan or policy) of 8    reimbursement or payment for services with respect to 9    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 10    conditions benefits in the case of any participant or 11    beneficiary must be made available within a reasonable 12    time and in a reasonable manner and in readily 13    understandable language by the plan administrator (or the 14    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to the 15    participant or beneficiary upon request. 16    (f) As used in this Section, "group policy of accident and 17health insurance" and "group health benefit plan" includes (1) 18State-regulated employer-sponsored group health insurance 19plans written in Illinois or which purport to provide coverage 20for a resident of this State; and (2) State, county, 21municipal, or school district employee health plans. 22References to an insurer include all plans described in this 23subsection. 24    (g) (1) As used in this subsection:25    "Benefits", with respect to insurers that are not Medicaid 26managed care organizations, means the benefits provided for   SB3024- 13 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1treatment services for inpatient and outpatient treatment of 2substance use disorders or conditions at American Society of 3Addiction Medicine levels of treatment 2.1 (Intensive 4Outpatient), 2.5 (High-Intensity Outpatient), 3.1 (Clinically 5Managed Low-Intensity Residential), 3.5 (Clinically Managed 6High-Intensity Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Managed 7Residential) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services.8    "Benefits", with respect to Medicaid managed care 9organizations, means the benefits provided for treatment 10services for inpatient and outpatient treatment of substance 11use disorders or conditions at American Society of Addiction 12Medicine levels of treatment 2.1 (Intensive Outpatient), 2.5 13(High-Intensity Outpatient), 3.5 (Clinically Managed 14High-Intensity Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Managed 15Residential) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services. 16    "Substance use disorder treatment provider or facility" 17means a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed 18psychiatrist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or 19licensed, certified, or otherwise State-approved facility or 20provider of substance use disorder treatment.21    (2) A group health insurance policy, an individual health 22benefit plan, or qualified health plan that is offered through 23the health insurance marketplace, small employer group health 24plan, and large employer group health plan that is amended, 25delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or 26approved for issuance or renewal in this State, on or after   SB3024- 14 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1023) 2shall comply with the requirements of this Section and Section 3370c.1. The services for the treatment and the ongoing 4assessment of the patient's progress in treatment shall follow 5the requirements of 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060.6    (3) Prior authorization shall not be utilized for the 7benefits under this subsection. Except to the extent 8prohibited by Section 370c.1 with respect to treatment 9limitations in a benefit classification or subclassification, 10the insurer may require the substance use disorder treatment 11provider or facility to notify the insurer of the initiation 12of treatment. For an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed 13care organization, the substance use disorder treatment 14provider or facility may be required to give notification for 15the initiation of treatment of the covered person within 2 16business days. For Medicaid managed care organizations, the 17substance use disorder treatment provider or facility may be 18required to give notification in accordance with the protocol 19set forth in the provider agreement for initiation of 20treatment within 24 hours. If the Medicaid managed care 21organization is not capable of accepting the notification in 22accordance with the contractual protocol during the 24-hour 23period following admission, the substance use disorder 24treatment provider or facility shall have one additional 25business day to provide the notification to the appropriate 26managed care organization. Treatment plans shall be developed   SB3024- 15 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1in accordance with the requirements and timeframes established 2in 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060. No such coverage shall be subject to 3concurrent review prior to the applicable notification 4deadline. If coverage is denied retrospectively, neither the 5provider or facility nor the insurer shall bill, and the 6covered individual shall not be liable, for any treatment 7under this subsection through the date the adverse 8determination is issued, other than any copayment, 9coinsurance, or deductible for the treatment or stay through 10that date as applicable under the policy. Coverage shall not 11be retrospectively denied for benefits that were furnished at 12a participating substance use disorder facility prior to the 13applicable notification deadline except for the following:14        (A) upon reasonable determination that the benefits 15    were not provided;16        (B) upon determination that the patient receiving the 17    treatment was not an insured, enrollee, or beneficiary 18    under the policy;19        (C) upon material misrepresentation by the patient or 20    provider. As used in this subparagraph (C), "material" 21    means a fact or situation that is not merely technical in 22    nature and results or could result in a substantial change 23    in the situation;24        (D) upon determination that a service was excluded 25    under the terms of coverage. For situations that qualify 26    under this subparagraph (D), the limitation to billing for   SB3024- 16 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible shall not apply;2        (E) upon determination that a service was not 3    medically necessary consistent with subsections (h) 4    through (n); or5        (F) upon determination that the patient did not 6    consent to the treatment and that there was no court order 7    mandating the treatment. 8    (4) For an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed care 9organization, if an insurer determines that benefits are no 10longer medically necessary, the insurer shall notify the 11covered person, the covered person's authorized 12representative, if any, and the covered person's health care 13provider in writing of the covered person's right to request 14an external review pursuant to the Health Carrier External 15Review Act. The notification shall occur within 24 hours 16following the adverse determination.17    Pursuant to the requirements of the Health Carrier 18External Review Act, the covered person or the covered 19person's authorized representative may request an expedited 20external review. An expedited external review may not occur if 21the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility 22determines that continued treatment is no longer medically 23necessary. 24    If an expedited external review request meets the criteria 25of the Health Carrier External Review Act, an independent 26review organization shall make a final determination of   SB3024- 17 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1medical necessity within 72 hours. If an independent review 2organization upholds an adverse determination, an insurer 3shall remain responsible to provide coverage of benefits 4through the day following the determination of the independent 5review organization. A decision to reverse an adverse 6determination shall comply with the Health Carrier External 7Review Act.8    (5) The substance use disorder treatment provider or 9facility shall provide the insurer with 7 business days' 10advance notice of the planned discharge of the patient from 11the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility and 12notice on the day that the patient is discharged from the 13substance use disorder treatment provider or facility.14    (6) The benefits required by this subsection shall be 15provided to all covered persons with a diagnosis of substance 16use disorder or conditions. The presence of additional related 17or unrelated diagnoses shall not be a basis to reduce or deny 18the benefits required by this subsection.19    (7) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 20require an insurer to provide coverage for any of the benefits 21in this subsection.22    (8) Any concurrent or retrospective review permitted by 23this subsection must be consistent with the utilization review 24provisions in subsections (h) through (n). 25    (h) As used in this Section:26    "Generally accepted standards of mental, emotional,   SB3024- 18 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care" means 2standards of care and clinical practice that are generally 3recognized by health care providers practicing in relevant 4clinical specialties such as psychiatry, psychology, clinical 5sociology, social work, addiction medicine and counseling, and 6behavioral health treatment. Valid, evidence-based sources 7reflecting generally accepted standards of mental, emotional, 8nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care include 9peer-reviewed scientific studies and medical literature, 10recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional 11associations and specialty societies, including, but not 12limited to, patient placement criteria and clinical practice 13guidelines, recommendations of federal government agencies, 14and drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug 15Administration.16    "Medically necessary treatment of mental, emotional, 17nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions" means a 18service or product addressing the specific needs of that 19patient, for the purpose of screening, preventing, diagnosing, 20managing, or treating an illness, injury, or condition or its 21symptoms and comorbidities, including minimizing the 22progression of an illness, injury, or condition or its 23symptoms and comorbidities in a manner that is all of the 24following:25        (1) in accordance with the generally accepted 26    standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use   SB3024- 19 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    disorder or condition care;2        (2) clinically appropriate in terms of type, 3    frequency, extent, site, and duration; and4        (3) not primarily for the economic benefit of the 5    insurer, purchaser, or for the convenience of the patient, 6    treating physician, or other health care provider.7    "Utilization review" means either of the following:8        (1) prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently 9    reviewing and approving, modifying, delaying, or denying, 10    based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests 11    by health care providers, insureds, or their authorized 12    representatives for coverage of health care services 13    before, retrospectively, or concurrently with the 14    provision of health care services to insureds.15        (2) evaluating the medical necessity, appropriateness, 16    level of care, service intensity, efficacy, or efficiency 17    of health care services, benefits, procedures, or 18    settings, under any circumstances, to determine whether a 19    health care service or benefit subject to a medical 20    necessity coverage requirement in an insurance policy is 21    covered as medically necessary for an insured.22    "Utilization review criteria" means patient placement 23criteria or any criteria, standards, protocols, or guidelines 24used by an insurer to conduct utilization review.25    (i)(1) Every insurer that amends, delivers, issues, or 26renews a group or individual policy of accident and health   SB3024- 20 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1insurance or a qualified health plan offered through the 2health insurance marketplace in this State and Medicaid 3managed care organizations providing coverage for hospital or 4medical treatment on or after January 1, 2023 shall, pursuant 5to subsections (h) through (s), provide coverage for medically 6necessary treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or 7substance use disorders or conditions.8    (2) An insurer shall not set a specific limit on the 9duration of benefits or coverage of medically necessary 10treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 11disorders or conditions or limit coverage only to alleviation 12of the insured's current symptoms.13    (3) All utilization review conducted by the insurer 14concerning diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of insureds 15diagnosed with mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 16disorders or conditions shall be conducted in accordance with 17the requirements of subsections (k) through (w).18    (4) An insurer that authorizes a specific type of 19treatment by a provider pursuant to this Section shall not 20rescind or modify the authorization after that provider 21renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to 22this authorization for any reason, including, but not limited 23to, the insurer's subsequent cancellation or modification of 24the insured's or policyholder's contract, or the insured's or 25policyholder's eligibility. Nothing in this Section shall 26require the insurer to cover a treatment when the   SB3024- 21 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1authorization was granted based on a material 2misrepresentation by the insured, the policyholder, or the 3provider. Nothing in this Section shall require Medicaid 4managed care organizations to pay for services if the 5individual was not eligible for Medicaid at the time the 6service was rendered. Nothing in this Section shall require an 7insurer to pay for services if the individual was not the 8insurer's enrollee at the time services were rendered. As used 9in this paragraph, "material" means a fact or situation that 10is not merely technical in nature and results in or could 11result in a substantial change in the situation.12    (j) An insurer shall not limit benefits or coverage for 13medically necessary services on the basis that those services 14should be or could be covered by a public entitlement program, 15including, but not limited to, special education or an 16individualized education program, Medicaid, Medicare, 17Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security Disability 18Insurance, and shall not include or enforce a contract term 19that excludes otherwise covered benefits on the basis that 20those services should be or could be covered by a public 21entitlement program. Nothing in this subsection shall be 22construed to require an insurer to cover benefits that have 23been authorized and provided for a covered person by a public 24entitlement program. Medicaid managed care organizations are 25not subject to this subsection.26    (k) An insurer shall base any medical necessity   SB3024- 22 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1determination or the utilization review criteria that the 2insurer, and any entity acting on the insurer's behalf, 3applies to determine the medical necessity of health care 4services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and 5treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 6disorders or conditions on current generally accepted 7standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 8disorder or condition care. All denials and appeals shall be 9reviewed by a professional with experience or expertise 10comparable to the provider requesting the authorization.11    (l) In conducting utilization review of all covered health 12care services for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 13mental, emotional, and nervous disorders or conditions, an 14insurer shall apply the criteria and guidelines set forth in 15the most recent version of the treatment criteria developed by 16an unaffiliated nonprofit professional association for the 17relevant clinical specialty or, for Medicaid managed care 18organizations, criteria and guidelines determined by the 19Department of Healthcare and Family Services that are 20consistent with generally accepted standards of mental, 21emotional, nervous or substance use disorder or condition 22care. Pursuant to subsection (b), in conducting utilization 23review of all covered services and benefits for the diagnosis, 24prevention, and treatment of substance use disorders an 25insurer shall use the most recent edition of the patient 26placement criteria established by the American Society of   SB3024- 23 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1Addiction Medicine.2    (m) In conducting utilization review relating to level of 3care placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or any 4other patient care decisions that are within the scope of the 5sources specified in subsection (l), an insurer shall not 6apply different, additional, conflicting, or more restrictive 7utilization review criteria than the criteria set forth in 8those sources. For all level of care placement decisions, the 9insurer shall authorize placement at the level of care 10consistent with the assessment of the insured using the 11relevant patient placement criteria as specified in subsection 12(l). If that level of placement is not available, the insurer 13shall authorize the next higher level of care. In the event of 14disagreement, the insurer shall provide full detail of its 15assessment using the relevant criteria as specified in 16subsection (l) to the provider of the service and the patient.17    If an insurer purchases or licenses utilization review 18criteria pursuant to this subsection, the insurer shall verify 19and document before use that the criteria were developed in 20accordance with subsection (k). 21    (n) In conducting utilization review that is outside the 22scope of the criteria as specified in subsection (l) or 23relates to the advancements in technology or in the types or 24levels of care that are not addressed in the most recent 25versions of the sources specified in subsection (l), an 26insurer shall conduct utilization review in accordance with   SB3024- 24 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1subsection (k).2    (o) This Section does not in any way limit the rights of a 3patient under the Medical Patient Rights Act.4    (p) This Section does not in any way limit early and 5periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment benefits as 6defined under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(r).7    (q) To ensure the proper use of the criteria described in 8subsection (l), every insurer shall do all of the following:9        (1) Educate the insurer's staff, including any third 10    parties contracted with the insurer to review claims, 11    conduct utilization reviews, or make medical necessity 12    determinations about the utilization review criteria.13        (2) Make the educational program available to other 14    stakeholders, including the insurer's participating or 15    contracted providers and potential participants, 16    beneficiaries, or covered lives. The education program 17    must be provided at least once a year, in-person or 18    digitally, or recordings of the education program must be 19    made available to the aforementioned stakeholders.20        (3) Provide, at no cost, the utilization review 21    criteria and any training material or resources to 22    providers and insured patients upon request. For 23    utilization review criteria not concerning level of care 24    placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or other 25    patient care decisions used by the insurer pursuant to 26    subsection (m), the insurer may place the criteria on a   SB3024- 25 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    secure, password-protected website so long as the access 2    requirements of the website do not unreasonably restrict 3    access to insureds or their providers. No restrictions 4    shall be placed upon the insured's or treating provider's 5    access right to utilization review criteria obtained under 6    this paragraph at any point in time, including before an 7    initial request for authorization.8        (4) Track, identify, and analyze how the utilization 9    review criteria are used to certify care, deny care, and 10    support the appeals process.11        (5) Conduct interrater reliability testing to ensure 12    consistency in utilization review decision making that 13    covers how medical necessity decisions are made; this 14    assessment shall cover all aspects of utilization review 15    as defined in subsection (h).16        (6) Run interrater reliability reports about how the 17    clinical guidelines are used in conjunction with the 18    utilization review process and parity compliance 19    activities.20        (7) Achieve interrater reliability pass rates of at 21    least 90% and, if this threshold is not met, immediately 22    provide for the remediation of poor interrater reliability 23    and interrater reliability testing for all new staff 24    before they can conduct utilization review without 25    supervision.26        (8) Maintain documentation of interrater reliability   SB3024- 26 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    testing and the remediation actions taken for those with 2    pass rates lower than 90% and submit to the Department of 3    Insurance or, in the case of Medicaid managed care 4    organizations, the Department of Healthcare and Family 5    Services the testing results and a summary of remedial 6    actions as part of parity compliance reporting set forth 7    in subsection (k) of Section 370c.1.8    (r) This Section applies to all health care services and 9benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 10mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 11conditions covered by an insurance policy, including 12prescription drugs.13    (s) This Section applies to an insurer that amends, 14delivers, issues, or renews a group or individual policy of 15accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 16offered through the health insurance marketplace in this State 17providing coverage for hospital or medical treatment and 18conducts utilization review as defined in this Section, 19including Medicaid managed care organizations, and any entity 20or contracting provider that performs utilization review or 21utilization management functions on an insurer's behalf.22    (t) If the Director determines that an insurer has 23violated this Section, the Director may, after appropriate 24notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, assess a civil 25penalty between $1,000 and $5,000 for each violation. Moneys 26collected from penalties shall be deposited into the Parity   SB3024- 27 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1Advancement Fund established in subsection (i) of Section 2370c.1.3    (u) An insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms 4in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in 5operation, that undermine, alter, or conflict with the 6requirements of this Section.7    (v) The provisions of this Section are severable. If any 8provision of this Section or its application is held invalid, 9that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or 10applications that can be given effect without the invalid 11provision or application. 12    (w) Beginning January 1, 2026, coverage for medically 13necessary treatment of mental, emotional, or nervous disorders 14or conditions shall comply with the following requirements:15        (1) No policy shall require prior authorization for 16    outpatient or partial hospitalization services for 17    treatment of mental, emotional, or nervous disorders or 18    conditions provided by a physician licensed to practice 19    medicine in all branches, a licensed clinical 20    psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a 21    licensed clinical professional counselor, a licensed 22    marriage and family therapist, a licensed speech-language 23    pathologist, or any other type of licensed, certified, or 24    legally authorized provider, including trainees working 25    under the supervision of a licensed health care 26    professional listed under this subsection, or facility   SB3024- 28 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    whose outpatient or partial hospitalization services the 2    policy covers for treatment of mental, emotional, or 3    nervous disorders or conditions. Such coverage may be 4    subject to concurrent and retrospective review consistent 5    with the utilization review provisions in subsections (h) 6    through (n) and Section 370c.1. Nothing in this paragraph 7    (1) supersedes a health maintenance organization's 8    referral requirement for services from nonparticipating 9    providers. An insurer may require providers or facilities 10    to notify the insurer of the initiation of treatment as 11    specified in this subsection, except to the extent 12    prohibited by Section 370c.1 with respect to treatment 13    limitations in a benefit classification or 14    subclassification. No such coverage shall be subject to 15    concurrent review for any services furnished before an 16    applicable notification deadline, subject to the 17    following:18            (A) In the case of outpatient treatment, for an 19        insurer that is not a Medicaid managed care 20        organization, the insurer may set a notification 21        deadline of 2 business days after the initiation of 22        the covered person's treatment. A Medicaid managed 23        care organization may set a deadline of 24 hours after 24        the initiation of treatment. If the Medicaid managed 25        care organization is not capable of accepting the 26        notification in accordance with the contractual   SB3024- 29 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1        protocol within the 24-hour period following 2        initiation, the treatment provider or facility shall 3        have one additional business day to provide the 4        notification to the Medicaid managed care 5        organization.6            (B) In the case of a partial hospitalization 7        program, for an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed 8        care organization, the insurer may set a notification 9        deadline of 48 hours after the initiation of the 10        covered person's treatment. A Medicaid managed care 11        organization may set a deadline of 24 hours after the 12        initiation of treatment. If the Medicaid managed care 13        organization is not capable of accepting the 14        notification in accordance with the contractual 15        protocol during the 24-hour period following 16        initiation, the treatment provider or facility shall 17        have one additional business day to provide the 18        notification to the Medicaid managed care 19        organization. 20        (2) No policy shall require prior authorization for 21    inpatient treatment at a hospital for mental, emotional, 22    or nervous disorders or conditions at a participating 23    provider. Additionally, no such coverage shall be subject 24    to concurrent review for the first 72 hours after 25    admission, provided that the provider must notify the 26    insurer of both the admission and the initial treatment   SB3024- 30 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    plan within 48 hours of admission. A discharge plan must 2    be fully developed and continuity services prepared to 3    meet the patient's needs and the patient's community 4    preference upon release. Recommended level of care 5    placements identified in the discharge plan shall comply 6    with generally accepted standards of care, as defined in 7    subsection (h).8            (A) If the provider satisfies the conditions of 9        paragraph (2), then the insurer shall approve coverage 10        of the recommended level of care, if applicable, upon 11        discharge subject to concurrent review.12            (B) Nothing in this paragraph supersedes a health 13        maintenance organization's referral requirement for 14        services from nonparticipating providers upon a 15        patient's discharge from a hospital or facility.16            (C) Concurrent review for such coverage must be 17        consistent with the utilization review provisions in 18        subsections (h) through (n).19            (D) In this subsection, residential treatment that 20        is not otherwise identified in the discharge plan is 21        not inpatient hospitalization.22        (3) Treatment provided under this subsection may be 23    reviewed retrospectively. If coverage is denied 24    retrospectively, neither the insurer nor the participating 25    provider shall bill, and the insured shall not be liable, 26    for any treatment under this subsection through the date   SB3024- 31 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1    the adverse determination is issued, other than any 2    copayment, coinsurance, or deductible for the stay through 3    that date as applicable under the policy. Coverage shall 4    not be retrospectively denied for the first 72 hours of 5    admission to inpatient hospitalization for treatment of 6    mental, emotional, or nervous disorders or conditions, or 7    before the applicable deadline under paragraph (1) of this 8    subsection for outpatient treatment or partial 9    hospitalization programs, at a participating provider 10    except:11            (A) upon reasonable determination that the 12        inpatient mental health treatment was not provided;13            (B) upon determination that the patient receiving 14        the treatment was not an insured, enrollee, or 15        beneficiary under the policy; 16            (C) upon material misrepresentation by the patient 17        or health care provider. In this item (C), "material" 18        means a fact or situation that is not merely technical 19        in nature and results or could result in a substantial 20        change in the situation;21            (D) upon determination that a service was excluded 22        under the terms of coverage. In that case, the 23        limitation to billing for a copayment, coinsurance, or 24        deductible shall not apply;25            (E) for outpatient treatment or partial 26        hospitalization programs only, upon determination that   SB3024- 32 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1        a service was not medically necessary consistent with 2        subsections (h) through (n); or3             (F) upon determination that the patient did not 4        consent to the treatment and that there was no court 5        order mandating the treatment. 6        Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 7    require a policy to cover any health care service excluded 8    under the terms of coverage. 9        This subsection does not apply to coverage for any 10    prescription or over-the-counter drug.11        Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 12    require the medical assistance program to reimburse for 13    services not covered by the medical assistance program as 14    authorized by the Illinois Public Aid Code or the 15    Children's Health Insurance Program Act. 16    (x) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, nothing 17shall require the medical assistance program under Article V 18of the Illinois Public Aid Code or the Children's Health 19Insurance Program Act to violate any applicable federal laws, 20regulations, or grant requirements, including requirements for 21utilization management, or any State or federal consent 22decrees. Nothing in subsection (g) or (w) shall prevent the 23Department of Healthcare and Family Services from requiring a 24health care provider to use specified level of care, 25admission, continued stay, or discharge criteria, including, 26but not limited to, those under Section 5-5.23 of the Illinois   SB3024- 33 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1Public Aid Code, as long as the Department of Healthcare and 2Family Services, subject to applicable federal laws, 3regulations, or grant requirements, including requirements for 4utilization management, does not require a health care 5provider to seek prior authorization or concurrent review from 6the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, a Medicaid 7managed care organization, or a utilization review 8organization under the circumstances expressly prohibited by 9subsections (g) and (w). Nothing in this Section prohibits a 10health plan, including a Medicaid managed care organization, 11from conducting reviews for medical necessity, clinical 12appropriateness, safety, fraud, waste, or abuse and reporting 13suspected fraud, waste, or abuse according to State and 14federal requirements. Nothing in this Section limits the 15authority of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 16or another State agency, or a Medicaid managed care 17organization on the State agency's behalf, to (i) implement or 18require programs, services, screenings, assessments, tools, or 19reviews to comply with applicable federal law, federal 20regulation, federal grant requirements, any State or federal 21consent decrees or court orders, or any applicable case law, 22such as Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999), or (ii) 23administer or require programs, services, screenings, 24assessments, tools, or reviews established under State or 25federal laws, rules, or regulations in compliance with State 26or federal laws, rules, or regulations, including, but not   SB3024- 34 -LRB104 18555 BAB 31998 b1limited to, the Children's Mental Health Act and the Mental 2Health and Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act. 3    (y) (Blank). 4(Source: P.A. 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-650, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 68-15-25.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.